California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(d) Representation of the disability community in program planning and service delivery.

(e) The development of regional employment networks to participate in the federal Ticket to Work program and the role of the local board and one-stop centers in the Ticket to Work program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18010.

The California Workforce Investment Board shall report to the Governor and the Legislature by September 30, 2004, on the status of one-stop services to individuals with disabilities and implementation of the federal Ticket to Work program in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18012.

If permitted by federal law, the California Workforce Investment Board and local workforce investment boards shall include persons with disabilities or their representatives, with a particular effort to include such persons who are not employees of state or local government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1088, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. FAIR SHARE FROM BIG CORPORATIONS ACT [19000. - 19000.5.]

19000.

This Division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Fair Share from Big Corporations Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (SB 177)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19000.3.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) was passed on a partisan vote and signed by President Donald J. Trump on Independence Day, 2025.

(b) H.R. 1 made the largest cuts to the Medicaid program in history.

(c) H.R. 1 made these cuts in order to fund the largest tax breaks for big corporations in history, and those tax breaks amount to $900 billion in additional tax giveaways to profitable corporations at the expense of health insurance for low-income Americans.

(d) H.R. 1 gave these tax breaks to
 corporations regardless of whether they pay their workforce poverty wages, forcing their workforce to turn to safety net programs such as the Medicaid program.

(e) One of the most significant cuts in the Medicaid program, known as the Medi-Cal program in California, was a cut resulting from a new work and community engagement requirement.

(f) Data shows that 92 percent of adults who receive Medicaid benefits are working and are getting paid poverty wages.

(g) A 2022 Congressional Budget Office (CBO) report notes that, despite the rhetoric, work requirements are not likely to lead to increased employment unless paired with targeted work supports, such as childcare and transportation.

(h) Being denied health care does not make anyone better at finding a
 job, keeping a job, or getting more hours at the job they already have.

(i) Being threatened with losing health care does not help the millions of working adults who currently receive Medi-Cal benefits to increase their wages enough to afford nongovernment-funded health care or secure a job that has adequate health coverage.

(j) A growing body of research shows a healthy workforce provides businesses with a competitive advantage.

(k) When a big corporation relies on Medi-Cal to provide their employees with health insurance, they are relying on what amounts to taxpayer subsidies to gain the competitive advantage of a healthy workforce.

(l) The Department of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office have both reported that growing Medi-Cal costs are a
 leading factor in the state’s long-term structural deficit.

(m) In large part due to the negative impacts of HR 1 on the state’s finances, the state can no longer afford to maintain current subsidies for big corporations in the form of paying full costs of their employees’ enrollment in the Medi-Cal program.

(n) If HR 1 remains in effect, legislation will be considered as early as 2027 requiring big corporations to pay their fair share for their employees’ health insurance and reduce the taxpayer burden of big corporations’ employees being enrolled in Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (SB 177)   Effective July 6, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19000.5.

(a) (1) On or before March 1, 2027, the Department of Finance shall present to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee one or more options for holding the state’s largest corporations accountable for the taxpayer costs of their employees enrolled in the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(2) One of the options presented by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include a premium paid by employers with at least 250 employees to offset the taxpayer costs of their employees enrolled in the Medi-Cal program who are not offered employer health coverage.

(b) Each
 option presented by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Data prepared by the Employment Development Department, the State Department of Health Care Services, or other state departments working in cooperation with the Department of Finance, to show or estimate the number of workers at the state’s largest corporations who are enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, and other available information pertinent to the option.

(2) Proposed statutory language necessary to implement the option drafted by the Legislative Counsel Bureau.

(3) An analysis of the cost of, and timeline for, implementing the option, assuming that the option is enacted into law during the 2027 legislative session.

(c) (1) 
 The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on March 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) If the Medicaid program-related provisions of Public Law 119-21, enacted on July 1, 2025, are repealed on or before March 1, 2027, this section shall not become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (SB 177)   Effective July 6, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

